Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,120
Home services permit; issuance.

(1) A licensed cosmetology salon or esthetics salon may employ licensed cosmetologists and estheticians, according to the licensed activities of the salon, to perform home services by meeting the following requirements:

(a) In order to be issued a home services permit by the department, an applicant shall hold a current active salon license; and

(b) Any person seeking a home services permit shall submit a complete application at least ten days before the proposed date for beginning home services. Along with the application the applicant shall submit evidence of liability insurance or bonding.

(2) The department shall issue a home services permit to each applicant meeting the requirements set forth in this section.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 120;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 47;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 46;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,159;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 382;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 36.